de: Schallbechertyp der Kontrabassklarinette: Verstellbar; Abnehmbar; Fest; Sonstige
sv: Typ av kontrabasklarinettklocka: Justerbart; Löstagbart; Fast; Annat
vi: Loại chuông kèn clarinet contra-bass: Có thể điều chỉnh; Có thể tháo rời; Cố định; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de sino do clarinete contrabaixo: Ajustável; Removível; Fixo; Outro
ro-RO: Tip pâlnie pentru clarinet contra-bas: Ajustabil; Detașabil; Fix; Altele
es: Tipo de campana de clarinete contrabajo: Ajustable; Desmontable; Fija; Otra
en: Contra-bass clarinet bell type: Adjustable; Detachable; Fixed; Other
it: clarinetto contrabbasso tipo campana: Regolabile; Rimovibile; Fisso; Altro
lt-LT: Kontrabosinio klarneto varpo tipas: Reguliuojamas; Nuimamas; Fiksuotas; Kita
hu: Kontrabasszus-klarinét harangtípusa: Állítható; Levehető; Rögzített; Egyéb
pl: Typ czary głosowej klarnetu kontrabasowego: Regulowany; Odłączany; Stały; Inny
da: Type klokke på kontrabasklarinet: Justerbart; Aftageligt; Fast; Andet
sk-SK: Typ zvončeka pre kontrabasový klarinet: Nastaviteľný; Odnímateľný; Pevný; Iné
ru: Тип раструба контрабас-кларнета: Регулируемый; Съемный; Фиксированный; Другое
th: คลาริเน็ตคอนทราเบสแบบปากลำโพง: ปรับได้; ถอดได้; คงที่; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 倍低音單簧管喇叭口類型: 可調式; 可拆式; 固定式; 其他
nb: Kontrabassklarinettklokketype: Justerbar; Avtakbar; Fast; Annet
bg-BG: Тип камбана на контрабас кларинет: Регулируема; Отделяща се; Фиксирана; Друга
hr-HR: Tip zvona za kontrabas klarinet: Podesivo; Odvojivo; Fiksno; Ostalo
pt-BR: Tipo de sino do clarinete contrabaixo: Ajustável; Removível; Fixo; Outro
ko: 콘트라베이스 클라리넷 벨 유형: 조절 가능; 탈착식; 고정식; 기타
cs: Kontrabasový klarinet, zvonový typ: Nastavitelný; Odnímatelný; Pevný; Jiné
zh-CN: 低音单簧管喇叭口类型: 可调节; 可拆卸; 固定; 其他
tr: Kontrbas klarnet zil tipi: Ayarlanabilir; Çıkarılabilir; Sabit; Diğer
el: Τύπος καμπάνας κόντρα-μπάσου κλαρινέτου: Ρυθμιζόμενη; Αποσπώμενη; Σταθερή; Άλλο
fr: Type de pavillon de la clarinette contrebasse: Réglable; Détachable; Fixe; Autre
nl: Contrabasklarinet bekertype: Verstelbaar; Afneembaar; Vast; Overig
sl-SI: Vrsta odmevnika kontrabasovskega klarineta: Nastavljivo; Snemljivo; Fiksno; Drugo
ja: コントラバスクラリネットのベルタイプ: 調整可能; 取り外し可能; 固定; その他
fi: Kontrabassoklarinetin kellon tyyppi: Säädettävä; Irrotettava; Kiinteä; Muu